Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.174, is amended to read: 171.174 REVOCATION; FLEEING PEACE OFFICER OFFENSE. The commissioner of public safety shall revoke the license of a person upon receipt of a certificate of conviction showing that the person has in a motor vehicle violated section 609.487, subdivision 3new text begin , 3a,new text end or 4, or an ordinance in conformity with those subdivisions. The commissioner shall revoke the license as follows: (1) for the first offense under section 609.487, subdivision 3, for not less than one year; (2) for the second offense or subsequent offenses under section 609.487, subdivision 3, for not less than three years; (3)new text begin for an offense under section 609.487, subdivision 3a, for not less than four years;new text end new text begin (4) new text end for an offense under section 609.487, subdivision 4, clause (a), for not less than ten years; deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end for an offense under section 609.487, subdivision 4, clause (b), for not less than seven years; and deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end for an offense under section 609.487, subdivision 4, clause (c), for not less than five years. A limited license under section 171.30 may not be issued for one-half of the revocation period specified in clauses (1) to deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end and after that period is over only upon and as recommended by the adjudicating court. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.487, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Fleeing an officer; motor vehicle; culpable negligence. new text end new text begin Whoever, by means of a motor vehicle, flees or attempts to flee a peace officer who is acting in the lawful discharge of an official duty, and the perpetrator knows or should reasonably know the same to be a peace officer, and who in the course of fleeing operates the vehicle in a culpably negligent manner whereby the perpetrator creates an unreasonable risk and consciously takes chances of causing death or great bodily harm to another, is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than four years or to payment of a fine of not more than $8,000, or both. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.487, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Revocation; fleeing peace officer offense. When a person is convicted of operating a motor vehicle in violation of subdivision 3new text begin , 3a,new text end or 4, or an ordinance in conformity with those subdivisions, the court shall notify the commissioner of public safety and order the commissioner to revoke the driver's license of the person. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end